Lecture6/en_adjectives.twolc
Alphabet
    a b c d e f g h i j k l m n o p q r s t u v w x y z
        ' %^:0 y:i 0:d 0:g 0:m 0:t ;

Rule-variables
    Cx Cy ;

Sets
    Vowel = a e i o u y ;
        Cons = b c d f g h j k l m n p q r s t v w x z ;

Rules
    "YToI"
        y:i <=> _ %^: :e ;

    "DoubleCons"
        0:Cy <=> Cons Vowel Cx _ %^: :e ;
	              where Cx in ( d g m t )
		      Cy in ( d g m t )
		      matched;

    "CleanUp"
        %^:0 <=> _ ;
